Massachusetts, session 194th, H195.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION  1        Section 9 of chapter 117A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 
2016 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 10 and 11, the words "and final 
disposition does not exceed $3,500" and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 
establishment excluding non-funeral establishment charges (cash advances) does not exceed 
$7,000. 
SECTION  2       Section 9 of chapter 117A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 
2016 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in 
place thereof the following sentence:- 
The commonwealth may recover this expense from any legally liable family members in 
the manner provided in this chapter, and if such family members do not pay this expense, the 
commonwealth shall pay an amount not exceeding $2,000 to the funeral establishment if the total 
expense of the funeral and final disposition does not exceed $7,000, excluding cash advance 

of 3 13 items for services not directly provided by the funeral establishment and not included on the 
general price list. 
SECTION 3. Chapter 117A of the General Laws is hereby amended inserting after 
section 10 the following section:- 
Section 11. The Department of Transitional Assistance shall promulgate regulations 
applicable to the payment of funeral and final disposition expenses as pursuant to section 9 of 
chapter 117A, section 2 of chapter 118, and section 7 of chapter 118A to exclude cash advance 
items for services not directly provided by the funeral establishment and not included on the 
general price list from the calculation of the total expense of said funeral and final disposition. 
Funeral establishments shall include a general price list for services offered on their 
website in order to receive full payment or reimbursement from agencies and offices of the 
Commonwealth including, but not limited to the department of transitional assistance. 
SECTION 4. The third paragraph of Section 2 of chapter 118 of the General Laws is 
hereby amended by striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following 
sentence:- 
The department may pay a sum not exceeding $2,000 toward the funeral and final 
disposition of a recipient to the funeral establishment if there are insufficient resources to pay for 
the cost of such funeral and final disposition and if the total expense of the funeral and final 
disposition does not exceed $7,000, excluding cash advance items for services not directly 
provided by the funeral establishment and not included on the general price list. 

of 3 33  SECTION 5. Section 7 of chapter 118A of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking the third sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- 
The department may pay a sum not exceeding $2,000 toward the funeral and final 
disposition of a recipient to a funeral establishment if there are insufficient resources to pay for 
the cost of such funeral and final disposition and if the total expense of the funeral and final 
disposition does not exceed $7,000, excluding cash advance items for services not directly 
provided by the funeral establishment and not included on the general price list.